Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 6. Family Trust Companies

§ 13-5-601.
Powers of family trust companies; prohibitions.

A family trust company may, but only for family members:

Act or be appointed by any court within and outside this state to act as a fiduciary for family members for any purpose permitted by law;

Act as transfer agent or registrar of corporate stocks and bonds of family affiliates;

Purchase, invest in and sell stocks, bonds, mutual funds, mortgages and other securities for the account of family members;

Accept and execute any trust company business of family members permitted by any law of this or any other state or of the United States to be taken, accepted or executed by an individual;

Take oaths and execute affidavits by the oath or affidavit of its corporate officers or managing members;

Make any lawful fiduciary investment as permitted by Wyoming Uniform Prudent Investor Act;

Perform all acts necessary to exercise the powers enumerated in this section.

A family trust company shall not engage in:

Any banking business by accepting general deposits or issuing demand instruments; or

Trust company business with the public.

History.

Renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-210

by 2019 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a), deleted "chartered family trust company or a" from the beginning; in (a)(i), substituted "a" for "executor, administrator, guardian or conservator of estates of family members, assignee, receiver, depositary, trustee, custodian or in any other," deleted "or representative capacity" towards the end; in (a)(iii), deleted "the" preceding "family," substituted "members" for "trusts"; in (a)(iv), inserted "company" following "trust," deleted "or family affiliates" preceding "permitted by any law"; in (a)(v), substituted "corporate officers or managing members" for "president, vice president, secretary, assistant secretary, manager, trust officer or assistant trust officer"; in (b), deleted "chartered family trust company organized under this act or a" from the beginning; and in (a)(ii), substituted "Trust" for "Engage in" at the beginning.

§ 13-5-602.
Family trust companies; authorized actions and transactions; conflicts of interest.

In addition to the actions authorized by W.S.

13-5-601

and notwithstanding the other provisions of this chapter, while acting as a fiduciary a family trust company may:

Invest in a security of an investment company or investment trust for which the family trust company, or a family affiliate, provides services in a capacity other than as a fiduciary;

Place a security transaction using a broker that is a family affiliate;

Invest in an investment contract that is purchased from an insurance company or carrier owned by or affiliated with the family trust company or a family affiliate;

Enter into an agreement with a beneficiary or settlor of a trust with respect to the appointment or compensation of the family trust company or a family affiliate;

Transact business with another trust, estate, guardianship or conservatorship for which the family trust company is a fiduciary or in which a beneficiary of a trust for which the family trust company is a fiduciary has an interest;

Make an equity investment in a closely held entity that may or may not be marketable and that is owned or controlled, either directly or indirectly, by one (1) or more family members or family affiliates;

Deposit money in a financial institution that is owned or operated by a family affiliate;

Delegate the authority to conduct any transaction or action pursuant to this section to an agent of the family trust company or a family affiliate;

Purchase, sell, hold or invest in any security, bond, real or personal property, stock or other asset of a family affiliate;

Loan money to or borrow money from:

A beneficiary or settlor of a trust for which the family trust company is acting as fiduciary;

Another trust for which the family trust company is acting as fiduciary; or

A family affiliate.

Act as proxy in voting any shares of stock which are assets of a trust for which the family trust company is acting as fiduciary;

Exercise any powers of control with respect to any interest in an entity that is an asset of a trust for which the family trust company is acting as fiduciary, including, without limitation, the appointment of officers or directors of entities who are family affiliates; and

Receive reasonable compensation for its services or the services of a family affiliate.

A family trust company shall consider the following when undertaking a transaction or action authorized pursuant to subsection (a) of this section:

The interests of the beneficiaries of the trust for which the family trust company is acting as fiduciary if applicable; and

Whether the transaction or action complies with the terms of the governing documents of the family trust company establishing the fiduciary relationship, any applicable judgments, judicial decrees or court orders and any applicable consent agreements or releases.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 5.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, nothing in this section prohibits a family trust company from transacting business with or investing in any asset of:

A trust, estate, guardianship or conservatorship for which the family trust company is a fiduciary;

A family affiliate; or

Any other company, agent, entity or person for which a conflict of interest may exist.

If a potential conflict of interest exists as to a particular transaction between the family trust company, in its capacity as a fiduciary and the family trust company in its individual capacity, the transaction or action is not voidable if it:

Complies with the provisions of this section; or

Occurred before the family trust company entered into the fiduciary relationship.

A transaction by or action of a family trust company authorized by this section is not voidable if:

The transaction or action was authorized by the terms of the governing documents of the family trust company;

The transaction or action was approved by a court or was taken pursuant to a judicial decree or court order;

No interested person commenced a legal action relating to the transaction or action pursuant to subsection (f) of this section;

The transaction or action was authorized by a valid consent agreement or release signed by all interested persons to the transaction or action; or

The transaction or action occurred before the family trust company entered into the fiduciary relationship.

A legal action by an interested person alleging that a transaction or action by a family trust company is voidable because of the existence of a conflict of interest must be commenced within one (1) year of the date on which the interested person discovered, or by the exercise of reasonable diligence should have discovered, the facts in support of his or her claim.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, a family trust company is not required to obtain court approval for any transaction that otherwise complies with the provisions of this section.

History.

Renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-211

by 2019 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2019; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-211

by 2019 ch. 13, § 5, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 13, §
3, effective July 1, 2019, rewrote the section.

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 13, §
5, effective July 1, 2019, repealed former (b)(iii), which read: "(iii) Comply with: (A) The terms of the trust instrument establishing the fiduciary relationship; (B) A judgment, decree or court order; (C) The written consent of each interested person."

§ 13-5-603.
Organization of a chartered family trust company.

One (1) or more persons may subscribe to an organizational instrument in writing for the purpose of forming a chartered family trust company, subject to the conditions prescribed by law.

The articles of incorporation for a chartered family trust company organized as a corporation shall set forth all of the information required by W.S.

17-16-202

and the following:

The corporate name, which shall comply with W.S.

13-5-302

and

17-16-401

;

A statement that the articles of incorporation are made to enable the shareholders to avail themselves of the advantages of this chapter;

A statement that the corporation will act as a fiduciary exclusively for one (1) or more family members and will not engage in trust company business with the general public.

The articles of organization for a chartered family trust company organized as a limited liability company shall include the following information:

The name of the limited liability company, which must comply with W.S.

13-5-302

and

17-29-108

;

A statement that the articles of organization are made to enable the members to avail themselves of the advantage of this chapter;

A statement that the limited liability company will act as a fiduciary exclusively for one (1) or more family members and will not engage in trust company business with the general public.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 5.

This section shall not apply to a foreign corporation or foreign limited liability company that is qualified to do business in this state and that applies for a charter under this article.

History.

2019 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 3, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (b)(i), substituted “13-5-302” for “13-5-207,” deleted “and” at the end; in (b)(ii), substituted “chapter” for “act”; added (b)(iii); in (c)(i), substituted “13-5-302” for “13-5-207”; in (c)(ii), substituted “chapter” for “act”; added (c)(iii); and repealed former (d), which read: “A chartered family trust company organized as a limited liability company shall be subject to all of the same laws and regulations that relate to a chartered family trust company organized as a corporation. All managers and employees of a chartered family trust company organized as a limited liability company shall be subject to the same duties and liabilities as pertain to directors, trustees and employees of a chartered family trust company organized as a corporation.”

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added (e).

§ 13-5-604.
Requirements for chartered family trust company.

A chartered family trust company shall maintain:

A physical office in this state where original or true copies, including electronic copies, of all material business records and accounts of the chartered family trust company may be accessed and readily available for examination by the commissioner; and

A bank account with a state or nationally chartered bank or savings and loan association having a principal or branch office in this state.

The board of directors or managers of a chartered family trust company shall hold regular meetings not less than one (1) time each year. The commissioner may require a chartered family trust company to hold in-person or electronic meetings on a more frequent basis. A chartered family trust company shall maintain records of all proceedings.

History.

2019 ch. 13, § 4, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 3, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added (b).

§ 13-5-605.
Minimum capital requirements; investment of capital.

The initial capital required to organize a chartered family trust company shall be not less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00). The full amount of the initial capital must be paid in cash to the governing body of the chartered family trust company, exclusive of all organization expenses, before the chartered family trust company is authorized to commence business as a chartered family trust company. Once organized, a chartered family trust company shall maintain a minimum level of capital required by the commissioner to operate in a safe and sound manner based upon the commissioner’s examination of the company, provided that the level of capital in a chartered family trust company shall not be less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00).

History.

Renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-208

by 2019 ch. 13, § 4, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-606.
Procedures upon filing of organizational instruments, application and other information; application fee; approval or disapproval of application; criteria for approval; action upon application.

An applicant for a chartered family trust company charter must file an application with the commissioner on forms prescribed by the commissioner. The application must contain or be accompanied by such information as required pursuant to rules and regulations of the commissioner.

The application filed with the commissioner shall be accompanied by a fee established by rule and regulation of the commissioner to cover the expense of the investigation by the commissioner. If an application to become a chartered family trust company is withdrawn by the applicant at any time prior to the granting of the charter, the statutory application filing fee, less the amount of any expense authorized above and actually incurred, shall be refunded to the applicant.

The failure of the applicant to furnish required information, data, other material or the required fee within thirty (30) days after a written request from the commissioner may be considered a withdrawal of the application.

Within sixty (60) days after receipt of a completed application, the commissioner shall, in his discretion, approve, conditionally approve or disapprove the application. Prior to taking action on an application, the commissioner shall determine that:

The chartered family trust company is being formed for no other purpose than contemplated by the laws of this state;

The proposed capital and surplus are not less than the required minimum amount in W.S.

13-5-605

and are adequate in light of current and prospective conditions as determined by the commissioner;

The applicants, proposed officers and directors or managers have sufficient character, reputation, experience, ability and financial standing to afford reasonable promise of successful operation;

The name of the proposed chartered family trust company does not resemble the name of any other chartered family trust company or financial institution transacting business in the state so closely as to cause confusion;

The applicants have complied with all applicable provisions of law and such other facts and circumstances bearing on the proposed family trust company as the commissioner may reasonably deem relevant.

The commissioner shall take action upon the application by stating findings of fact and conclusions of law.

Upon approval of an application, the commissioner shall endorse upon the organizational instrument his approval and shall file one (1) copy of the application with the secretary of state, retain one (1) copy in his files and return one (1) copy to the applicant within twenty (20) days after the date of the decision of the commissioner approving the application. If the commissioner conditionally approves an application and the applicant complies with the conditions imposed by the commissioner, the commissioner shall approve the application and proceed in accordance with this section.

Notice of the entry of an order refusing a charter or imposing conditions upon approval of the charter to a family trust company must be given in writing, served personally or sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the applicant. If the commissioner disapproves or imposes conditions upon the application, the commissioner shall mail notice of the action to the applicants within twenty (20) days after the commissioner’s negative action. The company, upon appeal, is entitled to a hearing before the board pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. If no such appeal is made within thirty (30) days after the entry of an order refusing a charter or imposing conditions upon the charter to any applicant, the commissioner shall enter a final order.

History.

2015 ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-209

by 2019 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (b), substituted “established by rule and regulation of the commissioner” for “of ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00)” in the first sentence.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (d) substituted "sixty (60)" for "forty-five (45)"; in (d)(i), deleted "the legitimate objects" following "purpose than"; in (d)(ii), substituted "13-5-605" for "13-5-208"; in (d)(iii), inserted "or managers" following "directors"; and in (f), substituted "organizational instrument" for "articles of organization or incorporation" following "endorse upon the."

§ 13-5-607.
Inspection of chartered family trust company; fees; resolution fund account; confidentiality.

Every chartered family trust company is subject to inspection by the commissioner. The commissioner or a duly appointed examiner shall visit and examine each chartered family trust company as often as the commissioner deems necessary and at least once every three (3) years, with or without previous notice to the officers or managers of or anyone interested in the chartered family trust company. The commissioner or a duly appointed examiner shall make a complete and careful examination of the condition and resources of the chartered family trust company, the mode of managing the company’s affairs and conducting its business, all records, transactions and other data or documents pertaining to the actions of the family trust company, the action of its managers or officers and directors in the investment and disposition of trust funds, the safety and prudence of the company’s management, the security afforded to those by whom trust company engagements are held, whether the requirements of this chapter are being complied with and such other matters as the commissioner may prescribe.

and (c) Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 5.

All information, reports or applications obtained by the commissioner from an applicant or chartered family trust company are confidential.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 5.

History.

Renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-215

by 2019 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2019; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-215

by 2019 ch. 13, § 5, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 13, §
3, effective July 1, 2019, in (a), inserted "or managers" in the second sentence, inserted "managers or" in the third sentence, substituted "chapter" for "act" near the end; repealed former (b), which read: "On or before January 31 of each year, a chartered family trust company shall compute and pay supervisory fees to the commissioner based on the total asset base of the chartered family trust company as of the preceding December 31.
The supervisory fees shall be set by rule and regulation at an amount to provide for the supervision of the chartered family trust company as required by this act.
Such fees shall be established by rules of the commissioner to assure consistency with the cost of supervision and the fees paid by chartered family trust companies.
Other fees assessed for administrative services caused by applications or activities attributable to a specific family trust company shall be used to defray the cost of the special services and, to the extent possible, shall be recovered from the chartered family trust company that requires the special service."; repealed former (c), which read: "A portion of each chartered family trust company's supervisory fee shall be designated to the trust company resolution fund account created pursuant to subsection (e) of this section to be used by the commissioner in the event of involuntary dissolution of a chartered family trust company.
Expenditures to cover the expenses incurred by the commissioner as a result of the involuntary dissolution of a chartered family trust company shall be made from the fund account by warrants drawn from the state auditor and signed by the commissioner or the director.
The portion of the supervisory fee designated to the account shall be: (i)
Established and adjusted by rule and regulation of the commissioner; and (ii)
Remitted to the state treasurer for deposit to the trust company resolution fund account." ; and repealed former (e), which read: "There is created the trust company resolution fund account.
Funds in the account shall be expended as provided in subsection (c) of this section.
Funds in the account are continuously appropriated to be expended for the purposes of this section."

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 13, §
5, effective July 1, 2019, repealed former (b), which read: "On or before January 31 of each year, a chartered family trust company shall compute and pay supervisory fees to the commissioner based on the total asset base of the chartered family trust company as of the preceding December 31. The supervisory fees shall be set by rule and regulation at an amount to provide for the supervision of the chartered family trust company as required by this act. Such fees shall be established by rules of the commissioner to assure consistency with the cost of supervision and the fees paid by chartered family trust companies. Other fees assessed for administrative services caused by applications or activities attributable to a specific family trust company shall be used to defray the cost of the special services and, to the extent possible, shall be recovered from the chartered family trust company that requires the special service."; repealed former (c), which read: "A portion of each chartered family trust company’s supervisory fee shall be designated to the trust company resolution fund account created pursuant to subsection (e) of this section to be used by the commissioner in the event of involuntary dissolution of a chartered family trust company. Expenditures to cover the expenses incurred by the commissioner as a result of the involuntary dissolution of a chartered family trust company shall be made from the fund account by warrants drawn from the state auditor and signed by the commissioner or the director. The portion of the supervisory fee designated to the account shall be: (i) Established and adjusted by rule and regulation of the commissioner; and (ii) Remitted to the state treasurer for deposit to the trust company resolution fund account."; and repealed former (e), which read: "There is created the trust company resolution fund account. Funds in the account shall be expended as provided in subsection (c) of this section. Funds in the account are continuously appropriated to be expended for the purposes of this section."

§ 13-5-608.
Conversion from public trust company to chartered family trust company.

A public trust company that meets the requirements of W.S. 13-5-301(a)(viii),

13-5-604

and

13-5-605

may merge with, convert into or reorganize as a chartered family trust company upon application to the commissioner on forms approved by the commissioner.

For public trust companies established after July 1, 2019, seeking to convert from a public trust company to a chartered family trust company, the application filed with the commissioner shall be accompanied by a fee established by rule and regulation of the commissioner.

Within thirty (30) days after receipt of a completed application, a trust company that meets the requirements of this section and is in good standing with the commissioner, shall be issued a charter as a chartered family trust company.

The applicant shall be notified when the application is approved. Within twenty (20) days after notification, the applicant shall furnish the bonds required by W.S. 13-5-414(a).

History.

2015 ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-217

by 2019 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (b), substituted “established by rule and regulation of the commissioner” for “of ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00)” in the first sentence.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a), inserted "public" at the beginning, substituted "13-5-301(a)(viii),

13-5-604

and

13-5-605

" for "13-5-204(a)(vii),

13-5-206

and

13-5-208

"; in (b) inserted "public" preceding "trust company" twice, substituted "2019" for "2015"; and in (d), substituted "13-5-414(a) for "13-5-216(a)" at the end.